District of Columbia statutes.
32-1206

Notice.

(a)

The Mayor shall devise and an employer shall post and maintain in a conspicuous place, a notice that sets forth excerpts from or summaries of the pertinent provisions of this chapter and information that pertains to the filing of a complaint under this chapter.

(b)

Any employer who willfully violates this section shall be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $100 for each day that employer fails to post the notice.

Aug. 17, 1994, D.C. Law 10-146, § 7, 41 DCR 4477

History

1981 Ed., § 36-1606.

Prior Codifications